src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! Verb Inflection


LEXICON RegEr
+V+Inf:er # ;
+V: PresPart ;
+V: PastPart ;
!+V+Part+Pres:ant # ;
!+V+Part+Past:é%{T%} # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Ind:0 # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Ind:es # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Ind:et # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Ind:ons # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Ind:ez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Ind:ent # ;

+V+1s+SPast+Ind:ai # ;
+V+2s+SPast+Ind:as # ;
+V+3s+SPast+Ind:a%{T%} # ;
+V+1p+SPast+Ind:ames # ;
+V+2p+SPast+Ind:astes # ;
+V+3p+SPast+Ind:erent # ;

+V+1s+Ipfv+Ind:eie # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Ind:eies # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Ind:eit # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Ind:iiens # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Ind:iiez # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Ind:eient # ;

+V+1s+Fut+Ind:erai # ;
+V+2s+Fut+Ind:eras # ;
+V+3s+Fut+Ind:era%{T%} # ;
+V+1p+Fut+Ind:erons # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:erez # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:ereiz # ;
+V+3p+Fut+Ind:eront # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Sbjv:0 # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Sbjv:s # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Sbjv:t # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Sbjv:ons # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Sbjv:ez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Sbjv:ent # ;

+V+1s+Ipfv+Sbjv:asse # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Sbjv:asses # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Sbjv:ast # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Sbjv:issons # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Sbjv:issiens # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:issez # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:issiez # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:isseiz # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Sbjv:assent # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Cond:ereie # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Cond:ereis # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Cond:ereit # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Cond:eriiens # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Cond:eriiez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Cond:ereient # ;

+V+2s+Pres+Imp:e # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Imp:ons # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Imp:ez # ;

LEXICON RegIer
+V+Inf:ier # ;
+V: PresPart ;
+V: PastPart ;
!+V+Part+Pres:ant # ;
!+V+Part+Past:é%{T%} # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Ind:0 # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Ind:es # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Ind:e # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Ind:ons # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Ind:iez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Ind:ent # ;

+V+1s+SPast+Ind:ai # ;
+V+2s+SPast+Ind:as # ;
+V+3s+SPast+Ind:a%{T%} # ;
+V+1p+SPast+Ind:ames # ;
+V+2p+SPast+Ind:astes # ;
+V+3p+SPast+Ind:ierent # ;

+V+1s+Ipfv+Ind:eie # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Ind:eies # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Ind:eit # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Ind:iiens # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Ind:iiez # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Ind:eient # ;

+V+1s+Fut+Ind:ierai # ;
+V+2s+Fut+Ind:ieras # ;
+V+3s+Fut+Ind:iera%{T%} # ;
+V+1p+Fut+Ind:ierons # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:ierez # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:iereiz # ;
+V+3p+Fut+Ind:ieront # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Sbjv:0 # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Sbjv:s # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Sbjv:t # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Sbjv:ons # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Sbjv:iez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Sbjv:ent # ;

+V+1s+Ipfv+Sbjv:asse # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Sbjv:asses # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Sbjv:ast # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Sbjv:issons # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:issez # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Sbjv:assent # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Cond:iereie # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Cond:iereies # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Cond:iereit # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Cond:ieriiens # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Cond:ieriiez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Cond:iereient # ;

+V+2s+Pres+Imp:e # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Imp:ons # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Imp:iez # ;

LEXICON RegIr
+V+Inf:ir # ;
+V:iss PresPart ;
+V+Part+Past+Masc+Obl+Sg:i%{T%} # ;
+V+Part+Past+Fem+Sg:ie # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Ind:is # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Ind:is # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Ind:ist # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Ind:issons # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Ind:issez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Ind:issent # ;

+V+1s+SPast+Ind:i # ;
+V+2s+SPast+Ind:is # ;
+V+3s+SPast+Ind:i%{T%} # ;
+V+1p+SPast+Ind:imes # ;
+V+2p+SPast+Ind:istes # ;
+V+3p+SPast+Ind:irent # ;

+V+1s+Ipfv+Ind:isseie # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Ind:isseies # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Ind:isseit # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Ind:issiiens # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Ind:issiiez # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Ind:isseient # ;

+V+1s+Fut+Ind:irai # ;
+V+2s+Fut+Ind:iras # ;
+V+3s+Fut+Ind:ira%{T%} # ;
+V+1p+Fut+Ind:irons # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:irez # ;
+V+3p+Fut+Ind:iront # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Sbjv:isse # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Sbjv:isses # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Sbjv:isse # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Sbjv:issons # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Sbjv:issez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Sbjv:issent # ;

+V+1s+Ipfv+Sbjv:isse # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Sbjv:isses # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Sbjv:ist # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Sbjv:issons # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:issez # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Sbjv:issent # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Cond:ireie # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Cond:ireis # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Cond:ireit # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Cond:iriiens # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Cond:iriiez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Cond:ireient # ;

+V+2s+Pres+Imp:isse # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Imp:issons # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Imp:issez # ;

LEXICON RegRe
+V+Inf:re # ;
+V: PresPart ;
! +V+Part+Pres:ant # ;
+V+Part+Past:u # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Ind:0 # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Ind:s # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Ind:t # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Ind:ons # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Ind:ez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Ind:ent # ;

+V+1s+SPast+Ind:ui # ;
+V+2s+SPast+Ind:us # ;
+V+3s+SPast+Ind:u%{T%} # ;
+V+1p+SPast+Ind:umes # ;
+V+2p+SPast+Ind:ustes # ;
+V+3p+SPast+Ind:urent # ;

+V+1s+Ipfv+Ind:eie # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Ind:eies # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Ind:eit # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Ind:iiens # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Ind:iiez # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Ind:eient # ;

+V+1s+Fut+Ind:rai # ;
+V+2s+Fut+Ind:ras # ;
+V+3s+Fut+Ind:ra%{T%} # ;
+V+1p+Fut+Ind:rons # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:rez # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind+Gram/Late:roiz # ;
+V+3p+Fut+Ind:ront # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Sbjv:e # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Sbjv:es # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Sbjv:et # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Sbjv:ons # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Sbjv:ez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Sbjv:ent # ;

+V+1s+Ipfv+Sbjv:usse # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Sbjv:usses # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Sbjv:ust # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Sbjv:ussons # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Sbjv+Grma/Late:ussiens # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:ussez # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv+Gram/Late:ussoiz # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv+Gram/Late:ussiez # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Sbjv:ussent # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Cond+Gram:reie # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Cond:reies # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Cond:reit # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Cond:riiens # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Cond:riiez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Cond+Gram:reient # ;

+V+2s+Pres+Imp:0 # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Imp:ons # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Imp:ez # ;

LEXICON PastPart
+Part+Past:é%{T%} PartEndings ;

LEXICON PresPart
+Part+Pres+Masc+Nom+Sg:anz # ;
+Part+Pres+Masc+Obl+Sg:ant # ;
+Part+Pres+Masc+Nom+Pl:ant # ;
+Part+Pres+Masc+Obl+Pl:anz # ;

+Part+Pres+Fem+Nom+Sg:ant # ;
+Part+Pres+Fem+Nom+Sg:anz # ;
+Part+Pres+Fem+Obl+Sg:ant # ;
+Part+Pres+Fem+Nom+Pl:anz # ;
+Part+Pres+Fem+Obl+Pl:anz # ;

+Part+Pres+Neut:ant # ;
+Part+Pres+Neut:ant # ;

LEXICON PartEndings
+Masc+Nom+Sg:s # ;
+Masc+Obl+Sg:0 # ;
+Masc+Nom+Pl:0 # ;
+Masc+Obl+Pl:s # ;

+Fem+Nom+Sg:e # ;
+Fem+Obl+Sg:e # ;
+Fem+Nom+Pl:es # ;
+Fem+Obl+Pl:es # ;

LEXICON SPartEndings
+Masc:0 # ;

+Fem+Nom+Sg:e # ;
+Fem+Obl+Sg:e # ;
+Fem+Nom+Pl:es # ;
+Fem+Obl+Pl:es # ;
