src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs
amender:amend RegEr "to improve, to make amends" ;
amer:am RegEr       "to love" ;
    amer:aim RegEr  "to love" ;
    amer:aimm RegEr "to love" ;
apeler:apel%> RegEr   "to call" ; ! Irregular?
    apeler:appel%> RegEr "to call" ;
chanter:chant RegEr "to sing" ;
confesser:confess RegEr "to confess" ;
curer:cur RegEr     "to be concerned about, to treat" ;
demander:demand RegEr "to ask, to demand" ; ! Verify
disner:disn RegEr   "to dine" ;
doner:don RegEr     "to give" ;
durer:dur RegEr     "to last" ;
entrer:entr RegEr   "to enter" ;
gaver:gab   RegEr   "to joke" ;
garder:gard RegEr   "to guard" ;
jurer:jur RegEr     "to swear" ;
laver:lav   RegEr   "to wash" ;
livrer:livr RegEr   "to deliver, to hand over" ;
nier:nï RegEr       "to deny" ; ! RegIer?
nomer:nom   RegEr   "to name" ;
    nomer:nomm RegEr "to name" ;
ordonner:ordonn RegEr "to order, to ordain" ;
    ordonner:orden RegEr "to order, to ordain" ;
parler:parl RegEr   "to talk, to speak" ; ! Verify
passer:pass RegEr   "to pass, to surpass" ;
penser:pens RegEr   "to think, to ponder" ;
plorer:plot RegEr   "to weep" ;
porter:port RegEr   "carry, bring, wear" ; ! Verify
presenter:présent RegEr "to present" ; ! Verify
sonner:son RegEr    "to ring" ;
torner:torn RegEr   "to turn" ;
trouver:trouv RegEr "to find" ; ! Trover = Irregular
tuer:tu RegEr       "to kill" ;
aidier:aid RegIer   "to help" ;
appoiier:appoi RegIer "to lean" ; ! Verify stem
araisnier:araisn RegIer "to address" ;
comencier:comenc RegIer "to begin" ;
conseillier:conseill RegIer "to advise" ;
deignier:deign RegIer "to deign" ;
deraisnier:deraisn RegIer "to argue" ;
jugier:jug RegIer "to judge" ;
laissier:laiss RegIer "to leave, to let" ;
mangier:mang RegIer "to eat" ;
noncier:nonc RegIer "to announce" ;
otroier:otro RegIer "to grant" ;
preisier:preis RegIer "to value" ;
sachier:sach RegIer "to pull" ;
choisir:chois RegIr "to choose" ;
coillir:coill RegIr "to gather" ;
covrir:covr RegIr   "to cover" ;
fenir:fen RegIr     "to end" ;
dormir:dorm RegIr   "to sleep" ;
emplir:empl RegIr   "to fill" ;
faillir:faill RegIr "to fail" ;
ferir:fer RegIr     "to strike" ; ! Irregular PP- FIXME
florir:flor RegIr   "to bloom" ;
garir:gar RegIr     "to save, to heal" ;
odir:od RegIr       "to hear" ; ! Irregular
ofrir:ofr RegIr     "to offer" ;
oir:o RegIr         "to hear" ; ! Irregular
partir:part RegIr   "to leave, to divide" ; ! CHECK
servir:serv RegIr   "to serve" ;
corre:cor RegRe     "to run" ;
cosdre:cosd RegRe   "to sew" ;
defendre:defend RegRe "to defend" ;
    defendre:deffend RegRe "to defend" ;
entendre:enten%{D%} RegRe "to listen" ;
naistre:naist RegRe "to be born" ;
perdre:perd RegRe   "to lose" ;
rendre:rend RegRe   "to give, to give up, to return" ;
respondre:respond RegRe "to reply" ;
rompre:romp RegRe   "to break" ;
veintre:veint RegRe "to conquer" ;
